test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_karrii_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - karrii: # MLO, ok 
    karrii+N+Sg+Nom:  karrii
    karrii+N+Sg+Gen:  karrii
    karrii+N+Sg+Acc:  karrii
    karrii+N+Sg+Ill:  [karriijân, karrij]     
    karrii+N+Sg+Loc:  karrist 
    karrii+N+Sg+Com:  karrijn 
    karrii+N+Sg+Abe:  karriittáá
    karrii+N+Ess:   	karrin
    karrii+N+Par:  karrid
    karrii+N+Pl+Nom:  karriih
    karrii+N+Pl+Gen:  karrij
    karrii+N+Pl+Acc:  karrijd
    karrii+N+Pl+Ill:  karrijd
    karrii+N+Pl+Loc:  karrijn
    karrii+N+Pl+Com: karrijguin
    karrii+N+Pl+Abe: karrijttáá


# karrii is a rare word nowadays. Inflection checked with Ilmari Mattus and Matti Morottaja:
#IM: Eeči tuálvui poccuid karrij.
#MM: Knows karrij-form but would rather use j: karriijân. Late Lesk-Ant Uulá preferred long forms for Sg Ill. For the system it would be better to use actively karriijân and to accept karrij as Sg Ill (if someone would be able to produce it). 

#Both IM and MM: Karrist lii čääci.
# MM: produced ess + par with i: karrin, karrid. He advised to use ij for Pl forms, except Pl Nom. 
